Hawaii statutes.
§111-12 Appeals. Any person aggrieved
by a state agency's determination concerning eligibility for an amount of
relocation payments authorized by this chapter or by a determination that the
party is responsible for a code violation may appeal such determination to the
circuit court of the circuit in which the displaced person or party then
resides. The appeal shall be made pursuant to the administrative procedure act
set forth in chapter 91. [L 1970, c 166, §12; am L 1973, c 67, §1(3); am L
1987, c 10, §6 and c 162, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next